Illinois, session 104th, HB2783.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Illinois State Capitol Complex Menstrual Hygiene Product 6Accessibility Act. 7    Section 5. Responsibility of the Secretary of State. 8    (a) The Office of the Secretary of State shall ensure that 9menstrual hygiene products are provided, at no cost, in public 10restrooms located within the Illinois State Capitol and the 11William G. Stratton State Office Building.12    (b) The Secretary of State shall:13        (1) determine the appropriate locations for menstrual 14    product dispensers within the facilities;15        (2) establish a maintenance and restocking schedule to 16    ensure availability; and17        (3) oversee procurement, installation, and upkeep of 18    dispensers in the designated facilities. 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 201, 2026.